District of Columbia statutes.
16-5501

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Act in furtherance of the right of advocacy on issues of public interest” means:

(A)

Any written or oral statement made:

(i)

In connection with an issue under consideration or review by a legislative, executive, or judicial body, or any other official proceeding authorized by law; or

(ii)

In a place open to the public or a public forum in connection with an issue of public interest; or

(B)

Any other expression or expressive conduct that involves petitioning the government or communicating views to members of the public in connection with an issue of public interest.

(2)

“Claim” includes any civil lawsuit, claim, complaint, cause of action, cross-claim, counterclaim, or other civil judicial pleading or filing requesting relief.

(3)

“Issue of public interest” means an issue related to health or safety; environmental, economic, or community well-being; the District government; a public figure; or a good, product, or service in the market place. The term “issue of public interest” shall not be construed to include private interests, such as statements directed primarily toward protecting the speaker’s commercial interests rather than toward commenting on or sharing information about a matter of public significance.

(4)

“Personal identifying information” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3227.01(3).

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-351, § 2, 58 DCR 741
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 401, 59 DCR 6190
Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this chapter into law.